Utah statutes.
26-35a-103.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Nursing care facility" means:
(i)  a nursing care facility described in Subsection 26-21-2(17);
(ii)  beginning January 1, 2006, a designated swing bed in:
(A)  a general acute hospital as defined in Subsection 26-21-2(11); and
(B)  a critical access hospital which meets the criteria of 42, U.S.C.
1395i-4(c)(2) (1998); and
(iii)  an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded that is
licensed under Section 26-21-13.5.
(b)  "Nursing care facility" does not include:
(i)  the Utah State Developmental Center;
(ii)  the Utah State Hospital;
(iii)  a general acute hospital, specialty hospital, or small health care
facility as defined in Section 26-21-2; or
(iv) a Utah State Veterans' Home.
(2)  "Patient day" means each calendar day in which an individual patient is
admitted to the nursing care facility during a calendar month, even if on a
temporary leave of absence from the facility.
